Maryland, session 2025, HB0965.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Transportation
4–322.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0965*

HOUSE BILL 965
(a) (1) There is a Locally Operated Transit System Grant Program.
(2) The Department shall administer the program.
(b) (1) The purpose of the program is to provide funds to locally operated
transit systems in the State.
(D) (1) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2027, AND EACH FISCAL YEAR THEREAFTER,
THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ESTABLISH A METHOD TO DETERMINE FUNDING FOR
EACH LOCALLY OPERATED TRANSIT SYSTEM THAT WILL RESULT IN A FAIR AND
EQUITABLE DISTRIBUTION OF PROGRAM FUNDS FOR EACH COUNTY.
(2) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL DEVELOP CRITERIA FOR THE
DISTRIBUTION OF PROGRAM FUNDS TO ENSURE, TO THE EXTENT PRACTICABLE,
THAT THE DISTRIBUTION:
(I) 1. IS PROPORTIONATE TO EACH COUNTY’S POPULATION
AS DETERMINED BY THE U.S. CENSUS BUREAU; OR
2. IS EQUITABLE AMONG COUNTIES BASED ON A METRIC
THAT THE DEPARTMENT DETERMINES IS APPROPRIATE; AND
(II) ALLOWS FOR GROWTH OF LOCALLY OPERATED TRANSIT
SYSTEMS IN EACH COUNTY.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.